Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.100

"Convicted," time when.

As used in RCW 9.61.230, * 9.61.260, 9A.46.020, or 9A.46.110, a person has been "convicted" at such time as a plea of guilty has been accepted or a verdict of guilty has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial motions, and appeals.

[ 2004 c 94 s 5; 1992 c 186 s 5; 1985 c 288 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.61.260 was recodified as RCW 9A.90.120 pursuant to 2022 c 231 s 4.

Severability—Effective dates—2004 c 94: See notes following RCW 9A.90.120.

Severability—1992 c 186: See note following RCW 9A.46.110.